Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4482.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5q. The department of attorney general shall update the concealed pistol license reciprocity website established under section 5p at least every 60 days to display which states offer reciprocity to an individual who has been issued a concealed pistol license under section 5b. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4481 (request no. H02428'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.